en: Nozzle coating: Chromium nitride (CrN); Diamond-like carbon (DLC); Nickel; Titanium nitride (TiN); Uncoated; Other
hu: Fúvókabevonat: Króm-nitrid (CrN); Gyémántszerű szén (DLC); Nikkel; Titán-nitrid (TiN); Bevonat nélküli; Egyéb
zh-CN: 喷嘴涂层: 氮化铬 (CrN); 类金刚石碳 (DLC); 镍; 氮化钛 (TiN); 无涂层; 其他
ro-RO: Acoperire duză: Nitrură de crom (CrN); Carbon tip diamant (DLC); Nichel; Nitrură de titan (TiN); Necretată; Altele
ko: 노즐 코팅: 크롬 질화물 (CrN); 다이아몬드상 탄소 (DLC); 니켈; 티타늄 질화물 (TiN); 코팅 미처리; 기타
th: การเคลือบหัวฉีด: โครเมียมไนไตรด์ (CrN); คาร์บอนคล้ายเพชร (DLC); นิกเกิล; ไทเทเนียมไนไตรด์ (TiN); ไม่เคลือบผิว; อื่นๆ
ja: ノズルコーティング: 窒化クロム（CrN）; ダイヤモンドライクカーボン（DLC）; ニッケル; 窒化チタン（TiN）; 未塗装; その他
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava trysky: Nitrid chrómu (CrN); Diamantu podobný uhlík (DLC); Nikel; Nitrid titánu (TiN); Bez povrchovej úpravy; Iné
sv: Munstyckesbeläggning: Kromnitrid (CrN); Diamantliknande kol (DLC); Nickel; Titannitrid (TiN); Obelagd; Övrigt
sl-SI: Prevleka šobe: Kromov nitrid (CrN); Diamantu podoben ogljik (DLC); Nikelj; Titanov nitrid (TiN); Brez premaza; Drugo
hr-HR: Premaz mlaznice: Kromov nitrid (CrN); Ugljik sličan dijamantu (DLC); Nikal; Titanov nitrid (TiN); Nepremazani; Ostalo
vi: Lớp phủ đầu phun: Crôm nitrit (CrN); Carbon giống kim cương (DLC); Niken; Titan nitrit (TiN); Không phủ; Khác
el: Επίστρωση ακροφυσίου: Νιτρίδιο του χρωμίου (CrN); Άνθρακας τύπου διαμαντιού (DLC); Νικέλιο; Νιτρίδιο του τιτανίου (TiN); Χωρίς επίστρωση; Άλλο
es: Revestimiento de la boquilla: Nitruro de cromo (CrN); Carbono similar al diamante (DLC); Níquel; Nitruro de titanio (TiN); Sin recubrimiento; Otros
nl: Nozzle coating: Chroomnitride (CrN); Diamantachtige koolstof (DLC); Nikkel; Titaniumnitride (TiN); Ongecoat; Andere
bg-BG: Покритие на дюзата: Хромен нитрид (CrN); Диамантоподобен въглерод (DLC); Никел; Титанов нитрид (TiN); Без покритие; Други
fr: Revêtement de buse: Nitrure de chrome (CrN); Carbone adamantin (DLC); Nickel; Nitrure de titane (TiN); Sans enduit; Autre
pl: Powłoka dyszy: Azotek chromu (CrN); Węgiel diamentopodobny (DLC); Nikiel; Azotek tytanu (TiN); Niepowlekany; Inne
pt-BR: Revestimento do bico: Nitreto de cromo (CrN); Carbono tipo diamante (DLC); Níquel; Nitreto de titânio (TiN); Não revestido; Outro
cs: Povrchová úprava trysky: Nitrid chromu (CrN); Uhlík podobný diamantu (DLC); Nikl; Nitrid titanu (TiN); Nepotažený; Jiné
fi: Suuttimen pinnoite: Kromionitridi (CrN); Timantin kaltainen hiili (DLC); Nikkeli; Titaaninitridi (TiN); Päällystämätön; Muu
pt-PT: Revestimento do bico: Nitreto de crómio (CrN); Carbono tipo diamante (DLC); Níquel; Nitreto de titânio (TiN); Não revestido; Outro
nb: Dysebelegg: Kromnitrid (CrN); Diamantlignende karbon (DLC); Nikkel; Titannitrid (TiN); Ubelagt; Annet
ru: Покрытие сопла: Нитрид хрома (CrN); Алмазоподобный углерод (DLC); Никель; Нитрид титана (TiN); Без покрытия; Другой
da: Dysebelægning: Chromnitrid (CrN); Diamantlignende carbon (DLC); Nikkel; Titannitrid (TiN); Ubelagt; Andet
zh-TW: 噴嘴塗層: 氮化鉻（CrN）; 類鑽碳（DLC）; 鎳; 氮化鈦（TiN）; 無塗層; 其他
tr: Nozul kaplaması: Krom nitrür (CrN); Elmas benzeri karbon (DLC); Nikel; Titanyum nitrür (TiN); Kaplamasız; Diğer
de: Düsenbeschichtung: Chromnitrid (CrN); Diamantähnlicher Kohlenstoff (DLC); Nickel; Titannitrid (TiN); Unbeschichtet; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Antgalio danga: Chromo nitridas (CrN); Deimantui artima anglis (DLC); Nikelis; Titano nitridas (TiN); Nedengtas; Kita
it: Rivestimento dell'ugello: Nitruro di cromo (CrN); Carbonio simile al diamante (DLC); Nickel; Nitruro di titanio (TiN); Non rivestito; Altro